Louisiana, session 2026, HB1045.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:513(J)(1)(c)(iii) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
24:513(J)(1)(c)(v) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§513. Powers and duties of legislative auditor; audit reports as public records;
assistance and opinions of attorney general; frequency of audits; subpoena
power
* * *
J.(1) The audits enumerated in Subsection A of this Section shall be
conducted frequently enough to control and safeguard the assets of the auditee as
follows:
* * *
(c) The financial statements of local auditees as defined in Paragraph (A)(3)
of this Section shall be audited as follows:
* * *
(iii) Any local auditee that receives two hundred thousand dollars or more
in revenues and other sources in any one fiscal year, but less than five hundred
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1045 ENROLLED
thousand dollars the audit threshold amount provided pursuant to Item (iv) or (v) of
this Subparagraph, shall cause to be conducted an annual review of its financial
statements to be accompanied by an attestation report in accordance with the
Louisiana Governmental Audit Guide. However, the legislative auditor, at his
discretion, may require said local auditee to have an audit of its books and accounts.
* * *
(v)(aa) Notwithstanding Item (iv) of this Subparagraph, any local auditee in
a parish having a population in excess of twenty thousand two hundred persons and
less than twenty-one thousand persons as of the latest federal decennial census that
receives six hundred thousand dollars or more in revenues and other sources in any
one fiscal year shall be audited annually.
(bb) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July first of each year thereafter, if
there has been an increase in the unadjusted Consumer Price Index as published by
the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, in January of
each year, the audit threshold amount provided in Subitem (aa) of this Item shall be
increased by the same percentage as the percentage by which the Consumer Price
Index is increased, rounded to the nearest dollar. The legislative auditor shall adjust
the audit threshold amount according to the Consumer Price Index as provided in this
Subitem.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.